Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-701
Fiscal year; beginning; end.

The fiscal year shall commence on July 1 in each year and end on June 30 in each year.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 28, p. 27;

R.S.1913, § 5584;

Laws 1921, c. 212, § 1, p. 751;

C.S.1922, § 4891;

C.S.1929, § 84-701;

R.S.1943, § 84-701.